Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 2401.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Animal” means any animal other than a human and includes fowl, birds, fish, and reptiles.

“Board” means the Vermont Board of Veterinary Medicine created under this chapter.

“E.C.F.V.G.” means American Veterinary Medical Association Education Commission for Foreign Veterinary Graduates.

“Licensed veterinarian” means a person who is validly and currently licensed by the Board to practice veterinary medicine in Vermont.

“Practice of veterinary medicine” means:

for a consideration, to diagnose, treat, correct, change, relieve, or prevent animal disease, deformity, defect, injury, or other physical or mental conditions; including the prescription or administration of any drugs, biologic, apparatus, application, anesthetic, or other therapeutic or diagnostic substance or technique and the use of any manual or mechanical procedure for testing for pregnancy or for correcting sterility, or infertility, or to render advice or recommendation with regard to any of the acts described in this subdivision (A);

to represent, directly or indirectly, publicly or privately, an ability and willingness to do any act described in subdivision (A) of this subdivision (5);

to use any title, words, abbreviation, or letters in a manner or under circumstances that induce the belief that the person using them is qualified to do any act described in subdivision (A) of this subdivision (5), except where such a person is a veterinarian;

to perform a dental operation on an animal.

“School of veterinary medicine” means a college of veterinary medicine approved or accredited by the American Veterinary Medical Association.

“Disciplinary action” or “disciplinary cases” includes any action taken by a board against a licensee or applicant premised upon a finding of wrongdoing or unprofessional conduct by the licensee or applicant. It includes all sanctions of any kind, including obtaining injunctions, issuing warnings, and other similar sanctions and ordering restitution.

“Financial interest” means being:

a licensed veterinarian;

a person who deals in goods and services that are uniquely related to the practice of veterinary medicine; or

a person who has invested anything of value in a business that provides veterinary services.

“Dental operation” means:
(9) (A) “Dental operation” means:

the application or use of any instrument or device to any portion of an animal’s tooth, gum, or any related tissue for the prevention, cure, or relief of any wound, fracture, injury, or disease of an animal’s tooth, gum, or related tissue; and

preventive dental procedures, including the removal of calculus, soft deposits, plaque, or stains or the smoothing, filing, or polishing of tooth surfaces.

“Dental operation” does not mean the use by any person of cotton swabs, gauze, dental floss, dentifrice, toothbrushes, or similar items to clean an animal’s teeth.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 67

, § 1; amended

2007, No. 163

(Adj. Sess.), § 22;

2013, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2017, No. 48

, § 17.

§ 2402.
Prohibition; offenses.

No person shall:

practice or attempt to practice veterinary medicine or hold himself or herself out as being able to do so in this State without first having obtained a license from the Board;

use in connection with the person’s name any letters, words, or insignia indicating or implying that the person is a veterinarian unless the person is a graduate of a school of veterinary medicine;

practice or attempt to practice veterinary medicine during license revocation or suspension;

transfer a license to practice veterinary medicine; or

violate any of the provisions of this chapter.

A person who violates subdivision (a)(1), (2), or (3) of this section or who obtains a license by fraud or misrepresentation shall be subject to the penalties provided in

3 V.S.A. § 127(c)

.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 67

, § 1; amended

2007, No. 29

, § 34.

§ 2403.
Exemptions from licensure.

Regardless of whether acts performed are within the definition of the practice of veterinary medicine as defined in subdivision 2401(5) of this title, a license to practice veterinary medicine shall not be required under section 2402 of this title by the following:

The owner of an animal and the owner’s full-time regular employee caring for and treating the animal belonging to the owner, except where the ownership of the animal was transferred for purposes of circumventing this chapter.

A person advising with respect to or performing acts that are accepted livestock management practices and animal husbandry practices such as the use of procedures for artificial insemination, dehorning, clipping and shoeing animals, trimming feet, and use of handheld files, rasps, or other devices to remove overgrowth from the teeth of horses (floating), but not to include power-assisted filing or power-assisted floating, extraction of teeth, or other procedures that invade the soft tissue of the mouth. Prescription drugs shall not be used except by or on the order of a licensed veterinarian, as provided by State and federal law.

An employee of the federal, State, or local government performing his or her official duties.

A person who is a regular student in a school of veterinary medicine performing duties or actions assigned by his or her instructors, or working under the direct on-premises supervision of a licensed veterinarian during a school vacation period, or in a preceptorship program.

A veterinarian regularly licensed in another state consulting with a licensed veterinarian in this State.

Any merchant or manufacturer selling at his or her regular place of business medicines, feed, appliances, or other products used in the prevention or treatment of animal diseases.

A member of the faculty of a school of veterinary medicine performing his or her regular functions or a person lecturing or giving instructions or demonstrations at a school of veterinary medicine or in connection with a continuing education course or seminar.

Any person selling or applying any pesticide, insecticide, or herbicide.

Any person engaging in bona fide scientific research that reasonably requires experimentation involving animals.

Any employee of a licensed veterinarian performing duties other than diagnosis, prescription, or surgery under the direct on-premises supervision of the veterinarian who is responsible for his or her performance.

A graduate of a foreign college of veterinary medicine who is in the process of obtaining an E.C.F.V.G. certificate performing duties or actions under the direct on-premises supervision of a licensed veterinarian.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 67

, § 1; amended

2001, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. June 27, 2002;

2013, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 2404.
Immunity from liability; cases of animal cruelty.

There shall be no monetary liability on the part of, and no cause of action for damages shall arise against, a veterinarian licensed to practice in this State who, in good faith and in the normal course of practice, reports suspected cases of cruelty to animals, as defined in

13 V.S.A. §§ 352

and 352a, to any humane officer or officer as defined in

13 V.S.A. § 351(4)

or local board of health officer or agent.

There shall be no monetary liability on the part of, and no cause of action for damages against, a veterinarian licensed to practice in this State who accompanies a humane officer during the execution of a warrant pursuant to

13 V.S.A. § 354

, or evaluates the health of and provides medical attention to, including a decision for euthanasia, an animal brought to that veterinarian for health assessment or necessary medical care, pursuant to

13 V.S.A. § 354

.

There shall be no monetary liability on the part of, and no cause of action for damages against, a veterinarian licensed to practice in this State who inspects premises or orders a quarantine pursuant to

20 V.S.A. § 3682

or 3683.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 60

, § 12; amended

2013, No. 201

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 2405.
Immunity from liability for good samaritan acts.

For purposes of this section, an “emergency” shall include a fire, flood, storm, or other natural disaster, hazardous chemical or substance incident, vehicular collision with an animal, or other transportation accident where an animal is injured or in need of assistance to protect its health or life.

A veterinarian licensed by the Board or any other person who, in good faith, provides care and treatment to an animal during an emergency shall not be held liable for civil damages by the owner of the animal, unless his or her acts constitute gross negligence or unless he or she will receive or expects to receive remuneration.

Nothing contained in this section shall alter existing law with respect to tort liability of a practitioner of veterinary medicine for acts committed in the ordinary course of his or her practice.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 24, eff. June 27, 2002.